Maryland, session 2026, HB0594.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
2–1303.
After making the distributions required under §§ 2–1301 through 2–1302.5 of this
subtitle, the Comptroller shall pay:
(1) revenues from the hotel surcharge into the Dorchester County
Economic Development Fund established under § 10–130 of the Economic Development
Article;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0594*

HOUSE BILL 594
(2) TO THE CITY OF BALTIMORE, ONE–THIRD OF THE REVENUES
FROM SALES AND USE TAXES COLLECTED AND REMITTED FROM RETAIL SALES THAT
OCCUR WITHIN THE CITY OF BALTIMORE;
(3) to the Blueprint for Maryland’s Future Fund established under § 5–206
of the Education Article, the following percentage of the remaining sales and use tax
revenues:
(i) for fiscal year 2023, 9.2%;
(ii) for fiscal year 2024, 11.0%;
(iii) for fiscal year 2025, 11.3%;
(iv) for fiscal year 2026, 11.7%; and
(v) for fiscal year 2027 and each fiscal year thereafter, 12.1%; and
[(3)] (4) the remaining sales and use tax revenue into the General Fund
of the State.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.